Connecticut, session 2026, SB00012.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That sufficient funds be appropriated to the Department of
Transportation, from the Special Transportation Fund, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, to increase rail service on the Shore Line East rail
line between the city of New Haven and the town of Mystic on each
Friday, Saturday, Sunday and legal holiday between the last Monday in
May and the first Monday in September.